Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.29
Sales tax payment; exemption from use tax.

The storage, use, or other consumption in this state of property, the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of which are required to be included in the measure of the sales tax and on which the sales tax has been paid, is exempted from the use tax.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 52;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 48.